siciliano.lexc
LEXICON SufVerbIri

    +V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*iri #;
    !-- Needs SufClit to be done first!
    !+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*ir SufClit;

    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+SING:+IND+PRES+1+SING*u #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+SING:+IND+PRES+2+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+SING:+IND+PRES+3+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+PLUR:+IND+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+PLUR:+IND+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*inu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*unu #;

    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*ia #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*iu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*eva #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*evu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*iva #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*ivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*ivi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*evi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*ia #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*eva #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*iva #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*iamu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*evamu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*ivamu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*iavu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*evavu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*ivavu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*ianu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*evanu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*ivanu #;

    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ivi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ii #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ìi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*iu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+SING:+IND+PAST+2+SING*isti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:+IND+PAST+3+SING*ìu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*emmu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*emu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*istivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*astu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*istu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*erunu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*eru #;

    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING:+IND+FUT+1+SING*irò #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING:+IND+FUT+2+SING*irai #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING:+IND+FUT+3+SING*irà #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR:+IND+FUT+1+PLUR*iremu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR:+IND+FUT+2+PLUR*iriti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR:+IND+FUT+3+PLUR*irannu #;

    ! NOTE: subjunctive present is not used,
    ! indicative present used instead
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING*u #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR*inu #;

    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING*issi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING*issi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING*issi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR*issimu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR*issivu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*issiru #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*issinu #;

    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+SING:+COND+PRES+1+SING*iria #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+SING:+COND+PRES+2+SING*irissi #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+SING:+COND+PRES+3+SING*iria #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+PLUR:+COND+PRES+1+PLUR*iriamu #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+PLUR:+COND+PRES+2+PLUR*iriavu #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+PLUR:+COND+PRES+3+PLUR*irianu #;

    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+SING:+IMP+PRES+2+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+SING:+IMP+PRES+3+SING*issi #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR*issiru #;

    !----     unfinished italian forms        ---
    !+V_PP+PART+PRES+SING:+PART+PRES+SING*ente #;
    !+V_PP+PART+PRES+PLUR:+PART+PRES+PLUR*enti #;
    !----                                     ---

    +V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+SING:+PART+PAST+MASC+SING*utu #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING:+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING*uta #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR:+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR*uti #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR:+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR*uti #;

    +V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*ennu #;
    !--- Needs SufClit to be done first!
    !+V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*ennu SufClit;

LEXICON rscIri

    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+SING:+IND+PRES+1+SING*u #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*unu #;

LEXICON rscIri2

    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+SING:+IND+PRES+2+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+SING:+IND+PRES+3+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*inu #;

    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+SING:+IMP+PRES+2+SING*i #;

LEXICON Root
    l_battiri:batt+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_cadiri:cad+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_dormiri:dorm+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_durmiri:durm+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_partiri:part+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_pàrtiri:part+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_prividiri:privid+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_rispunniri:rispun+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_sapiri:sap+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_sbattiri:sbatt+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_spanniri:spann+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_spenniri:spenn+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_stenniri:stenn+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_tagghiri:taggh+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_tessiri:tess+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_togghiri:toggh+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_triiri:tri+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_tuiri:tu+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_viriri:vir+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_viviri:viv+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_vuliri:vul+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_abbabbiri:abbabb+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_abbiliri:abbil+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_agghiri:aggh+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_agghiùnciri:agghiùnc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_agiri:ag+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_airi:a+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_apriri:apr+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_arrinisciri:arrinisc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_avviniri:avvin+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_banniri:bann+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_cadiri:cad+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_canniri:cann+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_canusciri:canusc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_capiri:cap+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_càrciri:càrc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_chiri:ch+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_costruiri:costru+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_crisciri:crisc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_cumpariri:cumpar+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_cunnùciri:cunnùc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_curriri:curr+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_dicìtiri:dicìt+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_duviri:duv+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_firi:f+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_firiri:fir+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_ghiri:gh+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_haviri:hav+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_jiri:j+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_junciri:junc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_jùnciri:jùnc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_leggiri:legg+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_lèggiri:lègg+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_liggiri:ligg+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_mintiri:mint+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_mpiri:mp+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_muriri:mur+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_nasciri:nasc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_ncucchiri:ncucch+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_pariri:par+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_piaciri:piac+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_premiri:prem+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_puniri:pun+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_règgiri:règg+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_riciviri:riciv+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_rimettiri:rimett+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_riri:r+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_scriviri:scriv+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_sirviri:sirv+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_spartiri:spart+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_spiriri:spir+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_spiri:sp+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_suffriri:suffr+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_sustiniri:sustin+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_tiniri:tin+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_uniri:un+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_valiri:val+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_vinciri:vinc+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_viri:v+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_vistiri:vist+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
   l_viviri:viv+V_IRI SufVerbIri;
    l_finiri:finisci+V_IRI rscIri;
    l_finiri:finisc+V_IRI rscIri2;
